Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1633
Authorization to operate; agent's permit; made conditional or revoked; cause; notice; hearing.

An authorization to operate or an agent's permit may be revoked or made conditional after its issuance if the board has reasonable cause to believe that the holder thereof has violated or is violating the Private Postsecondary Career School Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. Prior to such revocation or imposition of condition, the board shall notify the holder of the authorization or permit in writing of the impending action, setting forth the grounds for the action contemplated to be taken and advising the holder that if a hearing is requested in writing within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the board shall set a time and place for a hearing at which the holder may be heard in response to the allegation of noncompliance.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 33;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2833;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 33.